North Carolina, session 2025, SB1003.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-215.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(f6) With respect to permits for new or expanded wastewater treatment systems to be
located in a county with a projected population growth rate above two percent (2%) annually or
is located in one of the top twenty percent (20%) of the fastest growing counties in the State, by
population, permitting under the authority granted to the Commission by this section shall
comply with the procedures and time lines set forth in this subsection. The Commission shall act
on a permit application as quickly as possible. The following provisions apply:
(1) The Commission shall perform an administrative review of a new application
and of a resubmittal of an application determined to be incomplete under
subdivision (2) of this subsection within 30 working days of receipt to
determine if the information is administratively complete. If complete, the
Commission shall issue a receipt letter or electronic response stating that the
application is complete and that a 90-calendar day technical review period has
started as of the original date the application was received. If required items
or information are not included, the application shall be deemed incomplete
and the Commission shall issue an application receipt letter or electronic
response identifying the information required to complete the application
package before the technical review begins. When the required information is
received, the Commission shall then issue a receipt letter or electronic
response specifying that it is complete and that the 90-calendar day review
period has started as of the date of receipt of all required information. The
Commission shall develop an application package checklist identifying the
items and information required for an application to be considered
administratively complete. After issuing a letter or electronic response
requesting additional information based on the original submittal under this
subdivision, the Commission shall not subsequently request additional
information that was not previously identified as missing or required in that
additional information letter or electronic response from the original
submittal. The Commission may, however, respond to subsequent additional
*S1003-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
information letters or electronic responses with a request for additional
information limited to information missing from that subsequent additional
information letter or electronic response.
(2) If, during the 90-calendar day technical review period, the Commission
determines that additional information is required to continue processing the
application, the Commission and the applicant shall comply with the
following:
a. The Commission shall issue a letter or electronic response with a list
of the additional information required to issue the permit.
b. The applicant shall have 30 calendar days from the date the letter or
electronic response is sent to submit the additional information to the
Commission.
c. If the applicant fails to provide the required information within 30
calendar days, the Commission shall return the application to the
applicant, the application is deemed denied, and the applicant must
resubmit a complete application with a new application fee before the
project may be reviewed.
d. Upon receipt of the required information from the applicant, the
Commission shall have 30 calendar days to complete the technical
review and issue the permit, issue the permit with modifications, deny
the permit, or issue a letter or electronic response with a list of
additional information required to continue processing the application,
and the review process will proceed in accordance with
sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
e. After issuing a letter or electronic response requesting additional
information under this subdivision, the Commission shall not
subsequently request additional information that was not previously
identified as missing or required in that additional information letter
or electronic response. The Commission may request additional
information if required for the technical review based on any new
information, changed circumstances, or changed designs provided by
the applicant in the response under sub-subdivision b. of this
subdivision. Where the Commission identifies information that should
have been requested, the Commission may include conditions in or
modifications to the permit upon issuance addressing this information
but shall not deny the permit because of the missing information. This
prohibition on permit denial shall not apply where an application was
deemed denied under sub-subdivision c. of this subdivision.
(3) In accordance with 40 C.F.R. § 124.12, prior to issuance of a permit, the
Commission shall hold a public hearing whenever it finds, on the basis of
requests, a significant degree of public interest in the permit.
(4) The Department shall either approve or deny an application within (i) 90 days
of the date the application is deemed complete if no public hearing is held or
(ii) 120 days of the date the application is deemed complete if a public hearing
is held."
SECTION 2. The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality to implement the expedited permitting requirements established under
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1003-First Edition